Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 301 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. “Artificial intelligence companion” means an artificial
intelligence chatbot that:
a. provides adaptive, human-like responses to user
inputs, and
b. is designed to encourage or facilitate the simulation
of interpersonal or emotional interaction, friendship,
companionship, or therapeutic communication;
2. “Artificial intelligence chatbot” means:
a. any interactive computer service or software
application that:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1521 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(1) produces new expressive content or responses not
fully predetermined by the developer or operator
of the service or application, and
(2) accepts open-ended natural-language or multimodal
user input and produces adaptive or context-
responsive output, and
b. does not include an interactive computer service or
software application:
(1) the responses of which are limited to
contextualized replies, and
(2) that is unable to respond on a range of topics
outside of a narrow specified purpose;
3. “Covered entity” means any person who owns, operates, or
otherwise makes available an artificial intelligence chatbot to
individuals in this state;
4. “Minor” means any individual who has not attained eighteen
(18) years of age;
5. “Reasonable age verification measure” means a method of age
verification that is authenticated through the upload of a valid
state-issued form of identification to relate to a user of an
artificial chatbot;
6. “Reasonable age verification process” means an age
verification process employed by a covered entity that:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1521 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. uses one or more reasonable age verification measures
in order to verify the age of a user of an artificial
intelligence chatbot owned, operated, or otherwise
made available by the covered entity,
b. provides that requiring a user to confirm that the
user is not a minor, or to insert the user’s birth
date, is not sufficient to constitute a reasonable age
verification measure,
c. ensures that each user is subjected to each reasonable
age verification measure used by the covered entity as
part of the age verification process, and
d. does not base verification of a user’s age on factors
such as whether the user shares an Internet protocol
(IP) address, hardware identifier, or other technical
indicator with another user determined to not be a
minor; and
7. “Sexually explicit conduct” has the same meaning as defined
in subsection A of Section 1024.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 302 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. It shall be unlawful to design, develop, or make available
an artificial intelligence chatbot, knowing or with reckless
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1521 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

disr egard for the fact that the artificial intelligence chatbot
poses a risk of soliciting, encouraging, or inducing minors to:
1. Engage in, describe, or simulate sexually explicit conduct;
or
2. Create or transmit any visual depiction of sexually explicit
conduct, including any visual depiction described in subsection A of
Section 1024.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. It shall be unlawful to design, develop, or make available
an artificial intelligence chatbot, knowing or with reckless
disregard for the fact that the artificial intelligence chatbot
encourages, promotes, or coerces suicide, non-suicidal self-injury,
or imminent physical or sexual violence.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 303 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A covered entity shall require each individual accessing an
artificial intelligence chatbot to create a user account in order to
use or otherwise interact with such chatbot.
B. With respect to each user account of an artificial
intelligence chatbot that exists as of the effective date of this
act, a covered entity shall:
1. On such date, freeze all accounts;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1521 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. In order to restore the functionality of an account, require
that the user provide age data that is verifiable using a reasonable
verification process subject to subsection E of this section; and
3. Using age data, classify each user as a minor or an adult.
C. At the time an individual creates a new user account to use
or interact with an artificial intelligence chatbot, a covered
entity shall:
1. Request age data from the individual;
2. Verify the individual’s age using a reasonable age
verification process, subject to subsection E of this section; and
3. Using age data, classify each user as a minor or an adult.
D. If the age verification process determines that an
individual is a minor, a covered entity shall prohibit the minor
from accessing or using any artificial intelligence companion owned,
operated, or otherwise made available by the covered entity. A
covered entity shall periodically review previously verified user
accounts using a reasonable age verification process, subject to
subsection E of this section, to ensure compliance with this act.
E. A covered entity may contract with a third party to employ
reasonable age verification measures as part of the covered entity’s
reasonable age verification process, but the use of a third party
shall not relieve the covered entity of its obligations under this
act or from liability under this act.
F. A covered entity shall:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1521 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Establish, implement, and maintain reasonable data security
to:
a. limit collection of personal data to that which is
minimally necessary to verify a user’s age or maintain
compliance with this act, and
b. protect age verification data against unauthorized
access;
2. Protect the integrity and confidentiality of use
verification data by only transmitting data using industry-standard
encryption protocols;
3. Retain age verification data for no longer than is
reasonably necessary to verify a user’s age or maintain compliance
with this act; and
4. Not share with, transfer to, or sell the data to any such
entity.
G. An artificial intelligence chatbot made available to users
shall:
1. At the initiation of each conversation with a user and at
thirty-minute intervals, clearly and conspicuously disclose to the
user that the chatbot is an artificial intelligence system and not a
human being; and
2. Be programmed to ensure that the chatbot does not claim to
be a human being or otherwise respond deceptively when asked by a
user if the chatbot is a human being.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1521 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

H. An artificial intelligence chatbot may not represent,
directly or indirectly, that the chatbot is a licensed professional,
including, but not limited to, a therapist, physician, attorney,
financial advisor, or other professional. An artificial
intelligence chatbot made available to users shall, at initiation of
each conversation with a user and at reasonably regular intervals,
clearly and conspicuously disclose to the user that the chatbot does
not provide medical, legal, financial, or psychological services,
and users of the chatbot should consult a licensed professional for
such advice.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 304 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. In the case of a violation of Section 3 of this act, the
Attorney General may bring a civil action in the District Court of
Oklahoma County or a district court in the county in which the
violation occurred to:
1. Enjoin the violation;
2. Enforce compliance with Section 3 of this act; or
3. Obtain civil penalties under subsection C of this section.
B. The Attorney General may promulgate any rules necessary to
enforce the provisions of this act.
C. Any person who violates this act shall be subject to a civil
penalty not to exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1521 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

each violation. Each individual violation shall be considered a
separate violation.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND TELECOMMUNICATIONS
February 19, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED




















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1521 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)